Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-614
Unreversed transfer; considered encumbrance; when.

Any transfer of funds made pursuant to subsection (2) of section 84-612 and which has not been reversed as provided in such section shall be considered an encumbrance against the General Fund.

Laws 1983, LB 59, § 9;

Laws 1986, LB 870, § 3.